Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2694.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 * * *"Disadvantaged business." A business that is owned or controlled by a majority of persons, not limited to members of minority groups, who are subject to racial or ethnic prejudice or cultural bias.* * *"Diverse business." A disadvantaged business, minority-owned or women-owned business or service-disabled veteran-owned or veteran-owned small business that has been certified by a third-party certifying organization as defined in section 615(d).* * *"Small business." An independently owned and operated for-profit business that employs 100 or fewer employees and not a subsidiary or affiliate of a corporation.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 620. Additional dispensary permits authorized.The department shall issue an additional dispensary permit in each region established under section 603(d) to an applicant that is one of the following:(1) A disadvantaged business.(2) A diverse business.(3) A small business.Section 3. Section 1106 of the act is amended to read:Section 1106. [(Reserved).] Available licenses.The department shall:(1) No later than December 5 of each year, publish a list of the surrendered or revoked licenses under this chapter on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.20260HB2694PN3761 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) No later than January 15 of each year, accept applications for the licenses that appear on the list under paragraph (1) submitted by an applicant that is one of the following:(i) A disadvantaged business.(ii) A diverse business.(iii) A small business.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20260HB2694PN3761 - 3 - 12345678